Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.275

Transporting cattle carcass or primal part—Certificate of permit required.

Any cattle carcass, or primal part thereof, of any breed or age being transported in this state from other than a state or federal licensed and inspected slaughterhouse or common carrier hauling for the slaughterhouse, shall be accompanied by a certificate of permit signed by the owner of the carcass or primal part thereof and, if the carcass or primal part is delivered to a facility custom handling the carcasses or primal parts thereof, the certificate of permit shall be deposited with the owner or manager of the custom handling facility and the certificate of permit shall be retained for a period of one year and be made available to the department for inspection during regular business hours or any working shift.

[ 2003 c 326 s 33; 1967 c 240 s 37.]